Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3205
Company not domiciled in state; service
of process.

Each
person seeking registration as an appraisal management company in this state
that is not domiciled in this state shall submit an irrevocable consent that
service of process upon such person may be made by delivery of the process
to the director of the board if the plaintiff cannot, in the exercise of due
diligence, effect personal service upon the person in an action against the
applicant in a court of this state arising out of the person's activities
in this state.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 5.